Mississippi, session 2026, SB2240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  High school graduation requirement; civics course.  (1)  For purposes of this section, "civics course" means a course promulgated by the State Department of Education that must demonstrate a knowledge and understanding of the fundamentals of the history, principles and form of government of the United States. (2)  The State Board of Education shall provide that the requirements of this section shall be incorporated into the United States History curriculum required for high school students.  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the United States History curriculum shall include historical knowledge regarding the United States of America from the settlement of Jamestown, Virginia, in 1607 to the present. (3)  This section is applicable to any student who graduates from high school during or after the 2026-2027 school year. SECTION 2.  Section 37-16-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-16-7.  (1)  Each district school board shall establish standards for graduation from its schools which shall include, as a minimum: (a)  Mastery of minimum academic skills as measured by assessments developed and administered by the State Board of Education. (b)  Completion of a minimum number of academic credits, and all other applicable requirements prescribed by the district school board. (c)  Demonstration of proficiency in civics and United States History as prescribed in Section 1 of this act. ( * * *cd)  By school, information on high school graduation rates.  High schools with graduation rates lower than eighty percent (80%) must submit a detailed plan to the Mississippi Department of Education to restructure the high school experience to improve graduation rates. (2)  A student who meets all requirements prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall be awarded a standard diploma in a form prescribed by the State Board of Education. (3)  The State Board of Education may establish student proficiency standards for promotion to grade levels leading to graduation. (4)  The State Board of Education shall develop a curriculum related to the study of sign language. Any such class developed by the board may count as an academic credit for foreign languages for the purposes of high school graduation requirements. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.